New Jersey, session 222, A887.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, beginning on the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the authority shall not issue any form of financial assistance, including grants, loans, loan guarantees, tax credits, or other subsidies, to support the development or operation of a wind energy project. 2.    Section 7 of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-51) is amended to read as follows: 7.    a. The agencies administering programs established pursuant to this section shall maximize coordination in the administration of the programs to avoid overlap between the uses of the fund prescribed in this section. b.    Moneys in the fund, after appropriation annually for payment of administrative costs authorized pursuant to subsection c. of this section, shall be annually appropriated and used for the following purposes: (1)  Sixty percent shall be allocated to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority to provide grants and other forms of financial assistance to commercial, institutional, and industrial entities to support end-use energy efficiency projects and new, efficient electric generation facilities that are state of the art, as determined by the department, including but not limited to energy efficiency and renewable energy applications, to develop combined heat and power production and other high efficiency electric generation facilities, and to stimulate or reward investment in the development of innovative carbon emissions abatement technologies with significant carbon emissions reduction or avoidance potential[, to develop qualified offshore wind projects pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.48:3-87.1), and to provide financial assistance to manufacturers of equipment associated with qualified offshore wind projects].  The authority, in consultation with the board and the department, shall determine: (a) the appropriate level of grants or other forms of financial assistance to be awarded to individual commercial, institutional, and industrial sectors and to individual projects within each of these sectors; (b) the evaluation criteria for selecting projects to be awarded grants or other forms of financial assistance, which criteria shall include the ability of the project to result in a measurable reduction of the emission of greenhouse gases or a measurable reduction in energy demand, provided, however, that neither the development of a new combined heat and power production facility, nor an increase in the electrical and thermal output of an existing combined heat and power production facility, shall be subject to the requirement to demonstrate such a measurable reduction; and (c) the process by which grants or other forms of financial assistance can be applied for and awarded including, if applicable, the payment terms and conditions for authority investments in certain projects with commercial viability; (2)  Twenty percent shall be allocated to the board to support programs that are designed to reduce electricity demand or costs to electricity customers in the low-income and moderate-income residential sector with a focus on urban areas, including efforts to address heat island effect and reduce impacts on ratepayers attributable to the implementation of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.) or to support the light duty plug-in electric vehicle incentive program and the incentive program for in-home electric vehicle service equipment established pursuant to sections 4 and 6 of P.L.2019, c.362 (C.48:25-4 and C.48:25-6).  For the purposes of this paragraph, the board, in consultation with the authority and the department, shall determine the types of programs to be supported and the mechanism by which to quantify benefits to ensure that the supported programs result in a measurable reduction in energy demand or accomplishment of the plug-in electric vehicle goals established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2019, c.362 (C.48:25-3); (3)  Ten percent shall be allocated to the department to support programs designed to promote local government efforts to plan, develop and implement measures to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, including but not limited to technical assistance to local governments, and the awarding of grants and other forms of assistance to local governments to conduct and implement energy efficiency, renewable energy, and distributed energy programs and land use planning where the grant or assistance results in a measurable reduction of the emission of greenhouse gases or a measurable reduction in energy demand. For the purpose of conducting any program pursuant to this paragraph, the department, in consultation with the authority and the board, shall determine:  (a) the appropriate level of grants or other forms of financial assistance to be awarded to local governments; (b) the evaluation criteria for selecting projects to be awarded grants or other forms of financial assistance; (c) the process by which grants or other forms of financial assistance can be applied for and awarded; and (d) a mechanism by which to quantify benefits; and (4)  Ten percent shall be allocated to the department to support programs that enhance the stewardship and restoration of the State's forests and tidal marshes that provide important opportunities to sequester or reduce greenhouse gases. c. (1) The department may use up to four percent of the total amount in the fund each year to pay for administrative costs justifiable and approved in the annual budget process, incurred by the department in administering the provisions of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.) and in administering programs to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases including any obligations that may arise under subsection a. of section 11 of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-55). (2)  The board may use up to two percent of the total amount in the fund each year to pay for administrative costs justifiable and approved in the annual budget process, incurred by the board in administering the provisions of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.) and in administering programs to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases including any obligations that may arise under subsection a. of section 11 of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-55). (3)  The New Jersey Economic Development Authority may use up to two percent of the total amount in the fund each year to pay for administrative costs justifiable and approved in the annual budget process, incurred by the authority in administering the provisions of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.) and in administering programs to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases. d.    The State Comptroller shall conduct or supervise independent audit and fiscal oversight functions of the fund and its uses. e.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the use of moneys in the fund for any grant, financial incentive, or program in support of a wind energy project. (cf: P.L.2019, c.362, s.12) 3.    Section 75 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-343) is amended to read as follows: 75.  a.  The total amount of the tax credit for an eligible business for each new or retained full-time job shall be as set forth in subsections b. through g. of this section.  The total tax credit amount shall be calculated and credited to the business annually for each year of the eligibility period, notwithstanding any other provisions of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) to the contrary. b.    The base amount of the tax credit for each new or retained full-time job for an eligible business shall be as follows: (1)  for a qualified business facility located within a government-restricted municipality, or which is a mega project, $4,000 per year; (2)  for a qualified business facility located within an enhanced area, $3,500 per year; (3)  for a qualified business facility located within a distressed municipality, $3,000 per year; (4)  for a project in a qualified opportunity zone or an employment and investment corridor, $2,500 per year; and (5)  for a project in other eligible areas, $500 per year. c. (1) In addition to the base amount of the tax credit, the amount of the tax credit to be awarded for each new or retained full-time job shall be increased with the following bonuses: (a)   for an eligible business with a qualified business facility located in a municipality with a Municipal Revitalization Index distress score greater than 50, an increase of $1,000 per year; (b)  for an eligible business with a qualified business facility at which the capital investment in industrial or research and development premises for industrial or research and development use by the business is in excess of the minimum capital investment required for eligibility pursuant to subsection b. of section 71 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-339), an increase of $500 per year for each additional amount of investment that exceeds the minimum amount required for eligibility by 40 percent, with a maximum increase of $1,500 per year, unless the project qualifies as a mega project or the qualified business facility is located in a government-restricted municipality, in which case the maximum increase is $5,000 per year; (c)   for an eligible business with large numbers of new full-time jobs during the eligibility period, the increases shall be in accordance with the following schedule: (i)   if the number of new full-time jobs is between 251 and 400, $500 per year; (ii)  if the number of new full-time jobs is between 401 and 600, $750 per year; (iii) if the number of new full-time jobs is between 601 and 800, $1,000 per year; (iv) if the number of new full-time jobs is between 801 and 1,000, $1,250 per year; (v)  if the number of new full-time jobs is in excess of 1,000, $1,500 per year; (d)  for an eligible business that annually funds an industry-specific training program, which has the capacity to enroll 10 percent or more of the eligible business's full-time workforce, or pays a State educational institution to provide to the public an industry-specific training program, an increase of $500 per year; provided, however, that if the training program is provided by a State educational institution that is within 10 miles of the qualified business facility, then the increase shall be $1,000 per year; (e)   for an eligible business that qualifies as a small business, an increase of $500 per year; (f)   for an eligible business with new full-time jobs and retained full-time jobs at the qualified business facility with a median salary in excess of the existing median salary for the county in which the project is located, or, in the case of a project in a government-restricted municipality, a business with employees in full-time positions at the project with a median salary in excess of the median salary for the government-restricted municipality, an increase of $200 per year during the eligibility period for each 35 percent by which the project's median salary levels exceeds the county or government-restricted municipality median salary, with a maximum increase of $1,000 per year; (g)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2021, c.160); (h)  for an eligible business engaged primarily in a targeted industry, an increase of $500 per year; (i)   for an eligible business with a qualified business facility located in a qualified incubator facility, an increase of $500 per year; (j)   for an eligible business that enters into a labor harmony agreement in accordance with section 69 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-337), an increase of $2,000 per year for the portion of the project subject to that labor harmony agreement; provided further that an eligible business receiving a bonus under this subparagraph may exceed the limitation applicable to the eligible business pursuant to subsection d. of this section by an amount not to exceed $1,000; (k)  for an eligible business that provides its employees access to child care either through an on-site quality child care facility free of charge to its employees or through reimbursements paid by the eligible business to its employees for the cost of child care in accordance with standards adopted by the authority, an increase of $1,000 per year; (l)   for an eligible business that enters, or has previously entered, into an active partnership with a re-entry program for the purpose of identifying and promoting employment opportunities at the eligible business for former inmates and current inmates leaving the corrections system, and that hires at least one active participant in the re-entry program as a full-time employee, an increase of $500 per year; (m) for an eligible business with a qualified business facility that exceeds the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design's "Silver" rating standards but does not exceed "Gold" rating standards or completes substantial environmental remediation, an additional increase of $250 per year, or for an eligible business with a qualified business facility that exceeds the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design's "Gold" rating standards, an additional increase of $500 per year; (n)  for an eligible business in a targeted industry with a qualified business facility that is used by the eligible business to conduct a full time collaborative relationship with a college or university, including, but not limited to, a doctoral university, an increase of $1,000 per year; (o)  for an eligible business with a project that generates solar, geo-thermal, [wind,] or any other renewable or distributed energy, except wind energy, on site for use within the qualified business facility of an amount that equals at least 50 percent of the qualified business facility electric supply service needs, an increase of $500 per year; (p)  for an eligible business with a marine terminal project in a municipality located outside a government-restricted municipality, but within the geographical boundaries of the South Jersey Port District, an increase of $1,500 per year; (q)  for an eligible business with a qualified business facility located in a qualified opportunity zone, an increase of $1,000 per year; and (r)   for an eligible business if one-third or more of the members of the eligible business's governing board or other governing body self-identify as members of an underrepresented community, which may include Black, African American, Hispanic, Latino, Asian, Pacific Islander, Native American, Native Hawaiian, Alaska Native or gay, lesbian, bisexual or transgender, an increase of $2,000 per year for each new or retained full-time job. The authority shall work with the Chief Diversity Officer or other State entities to ensure that the bonus provided under this subparagraph is implemented faithfully and in compliance with law. (2)  The authority shall not award a bonus to an eligible business with full-time jobs at the qualified business facility that pay less than $15 per hour or 120 percent of the minimum wage fixed under subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4), whichever is higher. (3)  The authority may adopt, pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), criteria in addition to, or in place of, the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection in response to the prevailing economic conditions in the State. d.    The gross amount of the tax credit available to an eligible business for each new or retained full-time job shall be the sum of the base amount set forth in subsection b. of this section and the various additional bonus amounts for which the business is eligible pursuant to subsection c. of this section, subject to the following limitations: (1)  for a mega project or a project in a government-restricted municipality, the gross amount for each new or retained full-time job shall not exceed $8,000 per year; (2)  for a qualified business facility located within an enhanced area, the gross amount for each new or retained full-time job shall not exceed $6,000 per year; (3)  for a qualified business facility within a distressed municipality, the gross amount for each new or retained full-time job shall not exceed $5,000 per year; (4)  for a qualified business facility in a qualified opportunity zone or an employment and investment corridor, the gross amount for each new or retained full-time job shall not exceed $4,000 per year; and (5)  for a qualified business facility in other eligible areas, the gross amount for each new or retained full-time job shall not exceed $3,000 per year. e.    The authority shall reduce the gross amount of tax credits per full-time job: (1) if the median salary of new full-time jobs and retained full-time jobs subject to the project agreement is less than the existing median salary for the county in which the qualified business facility is located; or (2) for a project located in a government-restricted municipality, if the median salary of new full-time jobs and retained full-time jobs subject to the project agreement is less than the existing median salary for the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located.  The authority shall reduce the gross amount of tax credits per full-time job by an amount, in percentage points, equal to the percentage the median salary of new full-time jobs and retained full-time jobs subject to the project agreement is below the existing median salary for the county or government-restricted municipality in which the qualified business facility is located.  The authority shall not award a tax credit to an eligible business if the median salary of new full-time jobs and retained full-time jobs that would otherwise be subject to the project agreement is 30 percent or more below the relevant existing median salary for the county or government-restricted municipality in which the qualified business facility is located. f.     After the determination by the authority of the gross amount of tax credits for which an eligible business is eligible pursuant to subsection d. of this section, the final total tax credit amount shall be calculated as follows: (1) for each new full-time job, the eligible business shall be allowed tax credits equaling 100 percent of the gross amount of tax credits for each new full-time job; and (2) for each retained full-time job, the eligible business shall be allowed tax credits equaling 50 percent of the gross amount of tax credits for each retained full-time job. g.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections a. through f. of this section to the contrary, the following limitations shall apply: (1)  for each application approved by the board, the amount of tax credits available to be applied by the business annually shall not exceed an amount determined by the authority to be necessary to induce the project to be sited in New Jersey as determined by the board.  The authority shall determine the amount necessary to complete the project through staff analysis of all locations under consideration by the eligible business and all lease agreements, ownership documents, or substantially similar documentation for the eligible business's proposed in-State locations and potential out-of-State location alternatives, competitive proposals from other states, the prevailing economic conditions, and any other information that the authority deems relevant; and (2)  no application for a tax credit shall be approved by the board which is submitted by an eligible business engaged in the production of wind energy or the manufacture of equipment associated with the production of wind energy. (cf: P.L.2021, c.160, s.35) 4.    Section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362) is amended to read as follows: 98.  a.  The combined value of all tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276); the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287); the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302); the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310); the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335); the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); [section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4);] the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.); P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 et al.); and the "Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act," P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.) shall not exceed an overall cap of $11.5 billion over a nine-year period, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.  Of this $11.5 billion, $2.5 billion shall be reserved for transformative projects approved under the Aspire Program. b.  (1)  The total value of tax credits awarded under any constituent program of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.); the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.), P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 et al.); and the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (34:1B-403 et al.) shall be subject to the following limitations, except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section: (a)   for tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (b) (i) for tax credits awarded under the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $100,000,000; (ii) from the tax credits made available to the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the sum of $200,000,000 in tax credits shall be allocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), which tax credits shall be sold through competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110).  All proceeds of the tax credit auctions shall be used by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for the purposes authorized in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-107).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; (c)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $60 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $300,000,000; (d)  for tax credits awarded under the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $40 million; (e)   for tax credits awarded under the  "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $1,200,000,000; (f)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $1.1 billion.  If the authority awards tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitation, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be made available for [qualified offshore wind projects awarded under section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4), pursuant to subparagraph (h) of this paragraph,] projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (k) of this paragraph, projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (l) of this paragraph, cultural arts institutions awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (l) of this paragraph, or New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies awarded under sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b), pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subsection d. of this section.  During each of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $715 million for projects located in the northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $385 million for projects located in the southern counties of the State under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.).  If during any of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority awards tax credits under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year, provided that the uncommitted portion of tax credits shall be awarded for projects located in the applicable geographic area, except that (i) after the completion of the third year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy 50 percent of the uncommitted portion of tax credits for any previous year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; and (ii) after the completion of the sixth year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy all available tax credits, including the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year, without consideration to the county in which a project is located; (g)  except as provided in subparagraph (j) of this paragraph, for tax credits awarded for transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $2.5 billion. The total value of tax credits awarded for transformative projects in a given year shall not be subject to an annual limitation, except that the total value of tax credits awarded to any transformative project shall not exceed $400 million; (h)  [from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $350,000,000 shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded a credit pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) during the first three years of the nine-year period;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (i)   beginning in fiscal year 2023, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, additional amounts shall be made available for New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b); (j)   beginning in fiscal year 2024, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 may be annually transferred for the award to transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), provided that: (i) the remaining allocation of tax credits otherwise available for transformative projects, pursuant to subparagraph (g) of this paragraph, is less than $1,000,000,000; and (ii) the authority board determines that the transfer of tax credits is warranted based on such criteria as the authority deems appropriate, which may include the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  If a transfer of tax credits is made pursuant to this subparagraph, the authority shall award no greater than 65 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the northern counties of the State and no greater than 35 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the southern counties of the State; (k) beginning in fiscal year 2025, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.); (l)  once the tax credits allocated for competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110) pursuant to subsubparagraph (ii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph are exhausted, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the sum of $300,000,000 shall be made available to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), which tax credits shall be sold through  competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110).  The amount made available pursuant to this subparagraph shall be allocated in annual installments, each of which is not to exceed the cap set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-107), as needed to conduct auctions pursuant to that section.  All proceeds of the tax credit auctions shall be used by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for the purposes authorized in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-107).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; and (m) beginning in fiscal year 2026, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.) and an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for cultural arts institutions awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.). In accordance with the provisions of subsection g. of section 5 of P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-407), $100,000,000 of the tax credits made available to the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.) pursuant to this subparagraph shall be reserved exclusively for eligible businesses that are clean energy product manufacturers. (2)  The authority may in any given year determine that it is in the State's interest to approve an amount of tax credits in excess of the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no event more than $200,000,000 in excess of the annual limitation, upon a determination by the authority board that such increase is warranted based on specific criteria that may include: (i)   the increased demand for opportunities to create or retain employment and investment in the State as indicated by the volume of project applications and the amount of tax credits being sought by those applications; (ii)  the need to protect the State's economic position in the event of an economic downturn; (iii) the quality of project applications and the net economic benefit to the State and municipalities associated with those applications; (iv) opportunities for project applications to strengthen or protect the competitiveness of the State under the prevailing market conditions; (v)  enhanced access to employment and investment for underserved populations in distressed municipalities and qualified incentives tracts; (vi) increased investment and employment in high-growth technology sectors and in projects that entail collaboration with education institutions in the State; (vii)  increased development proximate to mass transit facilities; (viii)  any other factor deemed relevant by the authority. c.    In the event that the authority in any year approves projects for tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in future years for projects under the same program, provided however, that in no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits approved be in excess of the overall cap of $11.5 billion, and in no event shall the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year be deployed after the conclusion of the nine-year period. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the uncommitted balance of the total value of tax credits authorized for award by the authority pursuant to subparagraph (f) of paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 et seq.), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), shall be made available for tax credits allowed to New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b).  The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, made available to New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to this subsection shall be as follows: (1)  in fiscal year 2023, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; (2)  in fiscal year 2024, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; and (3)  in fiscal year 2025, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners, $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies, and $300,000,000 for taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies. If the value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in any fiscal year pursuant to this subsection is less than the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved in that fiscal year, the authority shall certify the amount of the remaining tax credits available for approval to each such category in that fiscal year and shall increase the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in the subsequent fiscal year by the certified amount remaining for each such category from the prior fiscal year. (cf: P.L.2025, c.127, s.10) 5.    Section 2 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-375) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in sections 1 through 9 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-374 through C.34:1B-382): "Assignment agreement" means an agreement in which a participating municipality assigns a C-PACE assessment to a capital provider, its designee, successor or assign. "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority. "Authorized municipality" means a municipality with a population that, as of the launch date, is in the top third of municipalities in the State in terms of population, according to the most recent American Community Survey published by the United States Census Bureau. "Capital provider" means: an accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer as defined respectively in Regulation D, Rule 501 (17 C.F.R.230.501 through 230.508) or Rule 144A (17 C.F.R.230.144A) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933" (15 U.S.C. s.77a et seq.), as amended; the trustee or custodian of a trust or custody arrangement which provides that each beneficial owner of interests shall be an accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer; a public entity; a special purpose securitization vehicle for the sale and transfer of securities, which is restricted to [those persons described in subsection a. or b. of this definition] an accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer, or a trustee or custodian of a trust or custody arrangement, that qualifies as a capital provider pursuant to this definition; or a commercial lending institution chartered by a state or the federal government, including, without limitation, a savings and loan association, a credit union, or a commercial bank. "C-PACE" means commercial property assessed clean energy. "C-PACE assessment" means a local improvement assessment, in accordance with chapter 56 of Title 40 of the Revised Statutes, imposed by a participating municipality on a property, with the consent of the owner of the property, and determined based upon either the existing use of a property or the contemplated use of unimproved property upon completion of new construction, as a means of securing financing provided pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-382) to finance a C-PACE project at the property, payments in respect of which assessment are collected by the participating municipality and remitted to the entity that provided the financing or its designee. "C-PACE assessment agreement" means an agreement between a participating municipality and a property owner in which the property owner agrees to the imposition of a C-PACE assessment on the property benefited by a C-PACE project within the municipality, and in which the participating municipality agrees to levy, bill, collect, remit, and, to the extent necessary, enforce the C-PACE assessment. "C-PACE project" means: the acquisition, construction, installation, modification, or, in the discretion of the authority and in accordance with guidelines adopted by the authority, entry into a capital lease of an energy efficiency improvement or renewable energy system including energy storage, microgrid, water conservation improvement, stormwater management system, electric vehicle charging infrastructure, flood resistant construction improvement, or hurricane resistant construction improvement, in each case affixed to a property, including new construction upon previously unimproved real property, within a participating municipality, provided that, on the basis of supplemental program guidelines to be published by the authority within 90 days following the launch date, a qualified professional attests that such new construction exceeds the minimum standards of the local and State building codes otherwise applicable to the property; at the discretion of, and in accordance with guidelines adopted by, the authority, a microgrid or district heating and cooling system in which a property owner within the municipality participates for the duration of the C-PACE assessment; or at the discretion of, and in accordance with guidelines adopted by, the authority, a power purchase agreement with respect to a renewable energy system affixed to a property. "Direct financing" means financing for a C-PACE project pursuant to a financing agreement entered into between a capital provider and a property owner. "Electric vehicle charging infrastructure" means equipment designed to deliver electric energy to a battery electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid vehicle. "Energy efficiency improvement" means an improvement to reduce energy consumption through conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural gas, propane, or other forms of energy, including, but not limited to:  air sealing; installation of insulation; installation of energy-efficient electrical, heating, cooling, or ventilation systems; building modifications to increase the use of daylight; energy efficient windows, doors, and glass; installation of energy or water controls or energy recovery systems; and installation of efficient lighting equipment. "Finance" or "financing" means the investing of capital in accordance with section 9 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-382), including, on the basis of supplemental program guidelines to be published by the authority within 90 days following the launch date, the refinancing of an investment in an existing C-PACE project. "Flood resistant construction improvement" means an improvement that mitigates the likelihood of flood damage, including, but not limited to, the installation of break-away walls and building elevation alterations. "Garden State C-PACE program" means the program established by the authority pursuant to sections 4 and 5 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-377 and C.34:1B-378). "Garden State program agreement" means an agreement between the authority and a participating municipality defining: the obligations of a municipality to participate in the Garden State C-PACE program, including the requirement that the participating municipality levy, bill, collect, remit, and enforce a C-PACE assessment; and the obligations, if any, that the authority may undertake (1) with respect to the remittance of C-PACE assessments to capital providers if the remittance is authorized by regulations adopted by the Local Finance Board pursuant to section 38 of P.L.2000, c.126 (C.52:27D-20.1) and requested by the participating municipality, and (2) to review and approve the participation of individual capital providers or financings in the Garden State C-PACE program. "Hurricane resistant construction improvement" means an improvement that enables a component of a structure to be in compliance with the standards for a "wind-borne debris region" adopted pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.), or into compliance with a successor standard under that code. "Launch date" means the date upon which the authority has taken all of the actions specified in subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-378), other than any actions that are expressly required by P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-374 et al.) to be taken within 90 days following the launch date. "Local C-PACE program" means a program established by an authorized municipality or a county pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-379). "Local C-PACE program ordinance" means an ordinance adopted by an authorized municipality or a county, and approved by the authority pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-380), to establish a program within its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection b. of section 5 and subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-378 and C.34:1B-379). "Microgrid" means a group of interconnected loads and distributed energy resources within clearly defined electrical boundaries that acts as a single controllable entity with respect to the electric distribution system and that connects and disconnects from the electric distribution system to enable it to operate when both connected to, or independent of, the electric distribution system. "Notice of assessment" means the document filed with the county recording officer in the county in which a property is located, which notifies prospective holders of an interest in the property that a C-PACE assessment lien has been placed on the property. "Opt-in ordinance" means an ordinance adopted by a municipality by which it authorizes its participation in the Garden State C-PACE program and authorizes the municipality to enter into a Garden State program agreement with the authority. "Participating municipality" means: a municipality that adopts an opt-in ordinance and executes a Garden State program agreement; or an authorized municipality that adopts an opt-in ordinance, executes a Garden State program agreement, and adopts a local C-PACE program ordinance and local C-PACE program guidelines approved by the authority. "Private entity" means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or any other form of private organization, including but not limited to a "related competitive business segment of a public utility holding company," or a "related competitive business segment of an electric public utility or gas public utility," as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51), so long as the organization is not subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities. "Program guidelines" means: any program-related rules or documents, or both, prepared and published by the authority that apply to the Garden State C-PACE program; or any program-related rules or documents, or both, prepared and published by an authorized municipality or a county, and approved by the authority, that apply to local C-PACE programs pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-379). "Project costs" means costs associated with a C-PACE project and shall include: direct costs, including but not limited to, equipment, materials, and labor related to the purchasing, constructing, installing, modifying, or acquiring a C-PACE project; indirect costs, including, but not limited to, expenses and fees of engineers, architects, and other professionals, inspection fees and permits, warranties and pre-paid maintenance contracts; program fees; and financing costs of a capital provider, including, but not limited to, origination fees, prepaid interest and payment reserves, closing costs, counsel fees, trustee or custodian fees, recording fees, and other financing charges, except that the authority may implement an alternative definition of "project costs" in its program guidelines in connection with the financing of new construction. "Property" means industrial, agricultural, or commercial property; residential property containing five or more dwelling units; common areas of condominiums and other planned real estate developments as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.419 (C.45:22A-23); and property owned by a tax-exempt or nonprofit entity, including, but not limited to, schools, hospitals, institutions of higher education, or religious institutions, within a participating municipality upon which a C-PACE assessment is imposed at the request of a property owner in connection with a C-PACE project. "Property owner" means an owner of a property within a participating municipality who consents to a C-PACE assessment being imposed on the property. "Renewable energy system" means an improvement by which electrical, mechanical, or thermal energy is produced from a method that uses one or more of the following fuels or energy sources:  hydrogen, solar energy, geothermal energy, or biomass, [or wind energy,] together with the other fuels and energy sources, not including wind energy, that the authority, after consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, may determine pursuant to program guidelines prepared and published pursuant to subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-378). "Solar renewable energy certificate" means the same as defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Stormwater management system" means the same as defined in section 3 of P.L.2019, c.42 (C.40A:26B-3). "Transition renewable energy certificate" means a certificate issued by the Board of Public Utilities or its designee, under the solar energy transition incentive program, which is designed to transition between the solar renewable energy certificate program and a solar successor incentive program to be developed by the Board of Public Utilities pursuant to P.L.2018, c.17 (C.48:3-87.8 et al.). "Uniform assessment documents" means a uniform C-PACE assessment agreement, assignment agreement, and notice of assessment, a model lender consent to a C-PACE assessment pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2021, c.201 (C.34:1B-378), and any other uniform or model documents prepared by the authority and used in the Garden State C-PACE program and local C-PACE programs, except that the authority shall not mandate a uniform financing agreement, which shall be supplied by the capital provider for direct financing. "Water conservation improvement" means an improvement that reduces water consumption, increases the efficiency of water use, or reduces water loss. (cf: P.L.2024, c.75, s.1) 6.    Section 2 of P.L.2023, c.99 (C.48:3-87.2b) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in P.L.2023, c.99 (C.48:3-87.2a et seq.): "Affiliated New Jersey offshore wind project" means any qualified offshore wind project awarded prior to the effective date of P.L.2023, c.99 (C.48:3-87.2a et seq.) with at least 10 percent common upstream ownership as another qualified offshore wind project. "Board" means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. "Enhanced area" means the same as that term is defined in section 69 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-337). "Incremental federal tax benefit" means a federal tax benefit that was established or increased after a project was approved by the board as a qualified offshore wind project and thus was not estimated in the project's original financial analysis and not included in the calculation of the OREC price submitted to the board. "Offshore wind renewable energy certificate" or "OREC" means a certificate, issued by the board or its designee, representing the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour of electric generation from a qualified offshore wind project. "Qualified offshore wind project" or "project" means a wind turbine electricity generation facility in the Atlantic Ocean in the Bureau of Ocean Energy Management Lease Area OCS-A 0498, awarded by the board prior to July 1, 2019, and connected to the electric transmission system in this State, and includes the associated transmission-related interconnection facilities and equipment, and approved by the board pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.48:3-87.1). "Qualified wind energy facility" means [the same as that term is defined in section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4)] any building, complex of buildings, or structural components of buildings, including water access infrastructure, and all machinery and equipment used in the manufacturing, assembly, development or administration of component parts that support the development and operation of a qualified offshore wind project, or other wind energy project as determined by the board. (cf: P.L.2023, c.99, s.2) 7.    Section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263) is amended to read as follows: 89.  a.  The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in paragraphs (1) through (5) or paragraphs (7) through (12) of subsection b. of this section and shall purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in paragraphs (6), (13), and (14) of subsection b. of this section, including tax credit transfer certificates issued by the director in lieu of a tax credit allowed under such programs.  The director shall not pay consideration in excess of 75 percent of the credit amount to be purchased, except for a credit awarded under: (1)  the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), which shall be subject to the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection d. of section 77 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-345); (2)  the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335), as amended and supplemented, for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director, and further provided that, if the application to the director is submitted after the sixth year of the eligibility period, the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment that the developer is required to pay pursuant to subsection c. of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328) shall increase to 50 percent; (3)  the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director; or (4)  the Garden State Film and Digital Media Jobs Act, P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b et al.), for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 95 percent of the credit amount for any original application approved by the authority on or after January 1, 2026, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the taxpayer, which taxpayer is a New Jersey studio partner or the holder of such certificate originally issued to a New Jersey studio partner, occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director and provided that the director shall purchase such certificates valued at no more than a cumulative amount of $80,000,000 in State fiscal year 2026, $160,000,000 in State fiscal year 2027, $240,000,000 in State fiscal year 2028, and $200,000,000 in each State fiscal year thereafter, subject to the conditions in this paragraph.  If an application to the director for the purchase of tax credits otherwise qualifies pursuant to this paragraph, but the value of tax credits for which the director receives applications exceeds the maximum cumulative amount for the State fiscal year in which the application is made, the director shall purchase the remaining tax credits in the State fiscal year next following the State fiscal year in which the application is made, provided that the director shall not purchase a cumulative amount above the maximum cumulative amount for the respective State fiscal year.  No payments shall be made pursuant to this paragraph unless the following conditions are met:  full funding is provided for the fiscal year to satisfy the requirement in Article VIII, Section IV, paragraph 1 of the New Jersey Constitution that the Legislature provide for the maintenance and support of a thorough and efficient system of free public schools for the instruction of children in the State between the ages of five and 18 years; full payment of the contributions required by law for the fiscal year is made to the State-administered retirement systems; and the annual appropriations act for the State fiscal year maintains a budgetary surplus of no less than 12 percent of total appropriations from the General Fund and the Property Tax Relief Fund. b.    The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may or shall, subject to the provisions of subsection a. of this section, purchase tax credits awarded under the following: (1)  the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276); (2)  the "Brownfield Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287); (3)  the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302); (4)  the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310); (5) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2025, c.127) (6)  the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335); (7)  the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); (8)  the Grow New Jersey Assistance Program established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-244); (9)  [section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4)] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); (10)  the State Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grant program established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489e); (11)  section 1 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b); (12)  section 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54A:4-12b); (13)  the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); (14)  the Garden State Film and Digital Media Jobs Act, P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b et al.); and (15)  sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110). (cf: P.L.2025, c.127, s.11) 8.    Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.349 (C.54:10A-5.29) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in sections 1 through 3 of P.L.1997, c.349 (C.54:10A-5.28 through 54:10A-5.30): "Advanced computing" means a technology used in the designing and developing of computing hardware and software, including innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment. "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials. "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Biotechnology" means the continually expanding body of fundamental knowledge about the functioning of biological systems from the macro level to the molecular and sub-atomic levels, as well as novel products, services, technologies, and sub-technologies developed as a result of insights gained from research advances which add to that body of fundamental knowledge. "Carbon footprint reduction technology" means a technology using equipment for the commercial, institutional, and industrial sectors that: increases energy efficiency, develops and delivers renewable or non-carbon-emitting energy technologies, develops innovative carbon emissions abatement with significant carbon emissions reduction potential, or promotes measurable electricity end-use energy efficiency. "Control," with respect to a corporation, means ownership, directly or indirectly, of stock possessing 80 percent or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of the stock of the corporation entitled to vote; and "control," with respect to a trust, means ownership, directly or indirectly, of 80 percent or more of the beneficial interest in the principal or income of the trust. The ownership of stock in a corporation, of a capital or profits interest in a partnership or association, or of a beneficial interest in a trust shall be determined in accordance with the rules for constructive ownership of stock provided in subsection (c) of section 267 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 ([26 U.S.C. § 267] 26 U.S.C. s.267), other than paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of that section. "Controlled group" means one or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common parent corporation if stock possessing at least 80 percent of the voting power of all classes of stock of each of the corporations is owned directly or indirectly by one or more of the corporations and the common parent owns directly stock possessing at least 80 percent of the voting power of all classes of stock of at least one of the other corporations. "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Diverse entrepreneur" means a New Jersey-based business that meets the criteria for a minority business or female business set forth in section 3 of P.L.1983, c.482 (C.52:32-19). "Electronic device technology" means a technology involving microelectronics, semiconductors, electronic equipment and instrumentation, radio frequency, microwave and millimeter electronics, and optical and optic-electrical devices or data and digital communications and imaging devices. "Information technology" means software publishing, motion picture and video production, television production and post-production services, telecommunications, data processing, hosting and related services, custom computer programming services, computer system design, computer facilities management services, other computer related services, and computer training. "Life sciences" means the production of medical equipment, ophthalmic goods, medical or dental instruments, diagnostic substances, biopharmaceutical products, or physical and biological research. "Medical device technology" means a technology involving any medical equipment or product (other than a pharmaceutical product) that has therapeutic value, diagnostic value, or both, and is regulated by the federal Food and Drug Administration. "Mobile communications technology" means a technology involving the functionality and reliability of the transmission of voice and multimedia data using a communication infrastructure via a computer or a mobile device that shall include, but not be limited to, smartphones, electronic books and tablets, digital audio players, motor vehicle electronics, home entertainment systems, and other wireless appliances, without having connected to any physical or fixed link. "New Jersey-based business" means a company with fewer than 150 employees, of whom at least 75 percent are filling a position in New Jersey, that is doing business, employing or owning capital or property, or maintaining an office in this State. "New Jersey emerging technology business" means a company with fewer than 150 employees, of whom at least 75 percent are filling a position in New Jersey, that is doing business, employing or owning capital or property, or maintaining an office in this State and: has qualified research expenses paid or incurred for research conducted in this State; conducts pilot scale manufacturing in this State; or conducts technology commercialization in this State in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, carbon footprint reduction technology, electronic device technology, information technology, life sciences, medical device technology, mobile communications technology, or renewable energy technology. "New Jersey emerging technology business holding company" means any corporation, association, firm, partnership, trust, or other form of business organization, but not a natural person, which directly or indirectly owns, has the power or right to control, or has the power to vote a controlling share of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation or other form of a New Jersey emerging technology business. "Partnership" means a syndicate, group, pool, joint venture, or other unincorporated organization through or by means of which any business, financial operation, or venture is carried on and which is not a trust or estate, a corporation, or a sole proprietorship. "Pilot scale manufacturing" means the design, construction, and testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, carbon footprint reduction technology electronic device technology, information technology, life sciences, medical device technology, mobile communications technology, and renewable energy technology, other than for commercial sale, excluding sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts, as calculated in the manner provided in section 6 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-6), from the sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed $1,000,000. "Qualified investment" means the non-refundable transfer of cash to a New Jersey emerging technology business or to a New Jersey emerging technology business holding company by a taxpayer that is not a related person of the New Jersey emerging technology business or the New Jersey emerging technology business holding company, the transfer of which is in connection with either: a transaction between or among the taxpayer and the New Jersey emerging technology business or the New Jersey emerging technology holding company or both in exchange for stock, interests in partnerships or joint ventures, exclusive or non-exclusive licenses [(exclusive or non-exclusive)], rights to use technology, marketing rights, warrants, options, or any items similar to those included herein, including, but not limited to, options or rights to acquire any of the items included herein or a purchase, production, or research agreement between or among the taxpayer and the New Jersey emerging technology business or the New Jersey emerging technology holding company or both.  "Qualified investment" also means the non-refundable transfer of cash or irrevocable contractual commitment to a qualified venture fund. "Qualified research expenses" means qualified research expenses, as defined in section 41 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 ([26 U.S.C. § 41] 26 U.S.C. s.41), as in effect on June 30, 1992, in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, carbon footprint reduction technology, electronic device technology, information technology, life sciences, medical device technology, mobile communications technology, or renewable energy technology. "Qualified venture fund" means a venture fund required by contract to invest a minimum of 50 percent of its funds in New Jersey-based businesses that the authority, in its sole discretion, based upon the qualified venture fund's investment history, if any, its private placement memorandum and other relevant information, has determined has the capacity to make the minimum investment. "Related person" means: a corporation, partnership, association, or trust controlled by the taxpayer; an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or trust that is in the control of the taxpayer; a corporation, partnership, association, or trust controlled by an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or trust that is in the control of the taxpayer; or a member of the same controlled group as the taxpayer. "Renewable energy technology" means a technology involving the generation of electricity from solar energy; [wind energy;] wave or tidal action; geothermal energy; the combustion of gas from the anaerobic digestion of food waste and sewage sludge at a biomass generating facility; the combustion of methane gas captured from a landfill; and a fuel cell powered by methanol, ethanol, landfill gas, digestor gas, biomass gas, or other renewable fuel, but not powered by a fossil fuel. "Tax year" means the fiscal or calendar accounting period of a taxpayer. "Venture fund" means a partnership, corporation, trust, or limited liability company that invests cash in a business during the early or expansion stages of a business in exchange for an equity stake in the business in[,] which the investment is made. Venture firm may include a venture capital fund, a family office fund, or a corporate investor fund, provided that a professional manager administers the venture firm. "Verified transfer of funds" means a non-refundable transfer of funds equal to 100 percent of the taxpayer's qualified investment in the New Jersey emerging technology business holding company to a New Jersey emerging technology business by the New Jersey emerging technology business holding company that is accompanied by documentation, as required by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, which provides proof of a cash transaction originating with a taxpayer and concluding with a New Jersey emerging technology business, provided that the transactions from origin to destination occur within the same tax year. The definitions of "advanced computing," "advanced materials," "biotechnology," "carbon footprint reduction technology," "electronic device technology," "information technology," "life sciences," "medical device technology," "mobile communications technology," "New Jersey emerging technology business," "pilot scale manufacturing," and "renewable energy technology" may be modified by regulation to conform to definitions in other programs administered by the authority. (cf: P.L.2025, c.71, s.1) 9.    Section 4 of P.L.2013, c.14 (C.54A:4-13) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  (1)  A taxpayer, upon approval of the taxpayer's application therefor by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, and in consultation with the director, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due for the taxable year in the taxable year in which the taxpayer applied, under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 35 percent of the qualified investment made by the taxpayer in a New Jersey emerging technology business, in a New Jersey emerging technology business holding company that makes a verified transfer of funds to a New Jersey emerging technology business, or in a qualified venture fund; provided, however, a taxpayer may be allowed a tax credit in an amount equal to 40 percent of the qualified investment if the taxpayer satisfies one of the requirements set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  The value of tax credits allowed to a taxpayer pursuant to this section shall not exceed $500,000 for each qualified investment made by the taxpayer. (2)  Subject to the limits established in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with the director, shall increase the amount of a tax credit allowed pursuant to this section by five percent if the taxpayer makes a qualified investment in a New Jersey emerging technology business, in a New Jersey emerging technology business holding company that makes a verified transfer of funds to a New Jersey emerging technology business, or in a qualified venture fund, if the New Jersey emerging technology business is either located in a qualified opportunity zone pursuant to 26 U.S.C. s.1400Z-1, or a low-income community as defined in subparagraph (e) of [26 U.S.C. § 45D] 26 U.S.C. s.45D; or certified by the State as a minority business or a women's business pursuant to P.L.1986, c.195 (C.52:27H-21.17 et seq.) and, in the case of a qualified venture fund, if the qualified venture fund commits by contract to invest 50 percent of its funds in diverse entrepreneurs. b.    The amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section shall be applied against the tax otherwise due under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., after all other credits and payments.  If the credit exceeds the amount of tax liability otherwise due, that amount of excess shall be an overpayment for the purposes of N.J.S.54A:9-7, provided, however, that subsection (f) of N.J.S.54A:9-7 shall not apply. c. (1) A partnership shall not be allowed a credit under this section directly, but the amount of credit of a taxpayer in respect of a distributive share of partnership income under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the credit acquired by the partnership that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total distributive income or gain of the partnership for its taxable year ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year.  For the purposes of subsection b. of this section, the amount of tax liability that would be otherwise due of a taxpayer is that proportion of the total liability of the taxpayer that the taxpayer's share of the partnership income or gain included in gross income bears to the total gross income of the taxpayer. (2)  The credit for a corporation that has made a valid election as a New Jersey S corporation pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1993, c.173 (C.54:10A-5.22) may be applied by the shareholders of the S corporation against the tax liability otherwise due under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., provided that the amount of credit that may be used by a shareholder of the S corporation shall be determined by allocating to each shareholder of the S corporation that proportion of the tax credit of the S corporation that is equal to the shareholder's proportionate share of the S corporation, whether or not distributed, of the total distributive income or gain of the S corporation for its tax period ending with or within the shareholder's tax period, and the credit may be applied by the shareholders against the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. d. (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Chief Executive Officer of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with the director, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations that are necessary to implement sections 1 through 3 of P.L.1997, c.349 (C.54:10A-5.28 through 54:10A-5.30) and this section, including, but not limited to: examples of and the determination of qualified investments of which applicants shall provide documentation with their tax credit application, the promulgation of procedures and forms necessary to apply for a credit, provisions for recapture in the event a taxpayer receives a credit on the basis of its commitment to transfer cash to a qualified venture fund and it does not fund its commitment, and provisions for credit applicants to be charged an initial application fee and ongoing service fees to cover the administrative costs related to the credit. (2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the Chief Executive Officer of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, rules and regulations that the chief executive officer deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section, as amended by P.L.2025, c.71, which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 365 days from the date of the filing.  The chief executive officer shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (3)  The amount of credits approved by the Chief Executive Officer of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority and the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury, pursuant to subsection a. of this section and pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1997, c.349 (C.54:10A-5.30), shall not exceed a cumulative total of $25,000,000, plus the value of any unused tax benefits from the immediately preceding State fiscal year, as determined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1997, c.334 (C.34:1B-7.42a), in any calendar year, to apply against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), and the tax imposed pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq.  If the cumulative amount of credits allowed to taxpayers in a calendar year exceeds the amount of credits available in that year, then taxpayers who have first applied for and have not been allowed a credit amount for that reason shall be allowed, in the order in which they have submitted an application, the amount of the tax credit on the first day of the next succeeding calendar year in which tax credits under this section and section 3 of P.L.1997, c.349 (C.54:10A-5.30) are not in excess of the amount of credits available. e.    As used in this section: "Advanced computing" means a technology used in the designing and developing of computing hardware and software, including innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment. "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials. "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Biotechnology" means the continually expanding body of fundamental knowledge about the functioning of biological systems from the macro level to the molecular and sub-atomic levels, as well as novel products, services, technologies, and sub-technologies developed as a result of insights gained from research advances which add to that body of fundamental knowledge. "Carbon footprint reduction technology" means a technology using equipment for the commercial, institutional, and industrial sectors that: increases energy efficiency, develops and delivers renewable or non-carbon-emitting energy technologies, develops innovative carbon emissions abatement with significant carbon emissions reduction potential, or promotes measurable electricity end-use energy efficiency. "Control," with respect to a corporation, means ownership, directly or indirectly, of stock possessing 80 percent or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of the stock of the corporation entitled to vote; and "control," with respect to a trust, means ownership, directly or indirectly, of 80 percent or more of the beneficial interest in the principal or income of the trust.  The ownership of stock in a corporation, of a capital or profits interest in a partnership or association or of a beneficial interest in a trust shall be determined in accordance with the rules for constructive ownership of stock provided in subsection (c) of section 267 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.267), other than paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of that section. "Controlled group" means one or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common parent corporation if stock possessing at least 80 percent of the voting power of all classes of stock of each of the corporations is owned directly or indirectly by one or more of the corporations and the common parent owns directly stock possessing at least 80 percent of the voting power of all classes of stock of at least one of the other corporations. "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Diverse entrepreneur" means a New Jersey-based business that meets the criteria for a minority business or female business set forth in section 3 of P.L.1983, c.482 (C.52:32-19). "Electronic device technology" means a technology involving microelectronics, semiconductors, electronic equipment and instrumentation, radio frequency, microwave and millimeter electronics, and optical and optic-electrical devices or data and digital communications and imaging devices. "Information technology" means software publishing, motion picture and video production, television production and post-production services, telecommunications, data processing, hosting and related services, custom computer programming services, computer system design, computer facilities management services, other computer related services, and computer training. "Life sciences" means the production of medical equipment, ophthalmic goods, medical or dental instruments, diagnostic substances, biopharmaceutical products, or physical and biological research. "Medical device technology" means a technology involving any medical equipment or product (other than a pharmaceutical product) that has therapeutic value, diagnostic value, or both, and is regulated by the federal Food and Drug Administration. "Mobile communications technology" means a technology involving the functionality and reliability of the transmission of voice and multimedia data using a communication infrastructure via a computer or a mobile device, that shall include, but not be limited to, smartphones, electronic books and tablets, digital audio players, motor vehicle electronics, home entertainment systems, and other wireless appliances, without having connected to any physical or fixed link. "New Jersey-based business" means a company with fewer than 150 employees, of whom at least 75 percent are filling a position in New Jersey, that is doing business, employing or owning capital or property, or maintaining an office in this State. "New Jersey emerging technology business" means a company with fewer than 150 employees, of whom at least 75 percent are filling a position in New Jersey, that is doing business, employing or owning capital or property, or maintaining an office in this State and: has qualified research expenses paid or incurred for research conducted in this State; conducts pilot scale manufacturing in this State; or conducts technology commercialization in this State in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, carbon footprint reduction technology, electronic device technology, information technology, life sciences, medical device technology, mobile communications technology, or renewable energy technology. "New Jersey emerging technology business holding company" means any corporation, association, firm, partnership, trust, or other form of business organization, but not a natural person, which directly or indirectly owns, has the power or right to control, or has the power to vote a controlling share of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation or other form of a New Jersey emerging technology business. "Partnership" means a syndicate, group, pool, joint venture, or other unincorporated organization through or by means of which any business, financial operation, or venture is carried on and which is not a trust or estate, a corporation, or a sole proprietorship. "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, carbon footprint reduction technology electronic device technology, information technology, life sciences, medical device technology, mobile communications technology, or renewable energy technology, other than for commercial sale, excluding sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts, as calculated in the manner provided in section 6 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-6), from the sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed $1,000,000. "Qualified investment" means the non-refundable transfer of cash to a New Jersey emerging technology business or to a New Jersey emerging technology business holding company by a taxpayer that is not a related person of the New Jersey emerging technology business or the New Jersey emerging technology business holding company, the transfer of which is in connection with either: a transaction between or among the taxpayer and the New Jersey emerging technology business or the New Jersey emerging technology holding company or both in exchange for stock, interests in partnerships or joint ventures, exclusive or non-exclusive licenses [(exclusive or non-exclusive)], rights to use technology, marketing rights, warrants, options, or any items similar to those included herein, including, but not limited to, options or rights to acquire any of the items included herein; or a purchase, production, or research agreement between or among the taxpayer and the New Jersey emerging technology business or the New Jersey emerging technology holding company or both.  "Qualified investment" also means the non-refundable transfer of cash or irrevocable contractual commitment to transfer cash to a qualified venture fund. "Qualified research expenses" means qualified research expenses, as defined in section 41 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.41), as in effect on June 30, 1992, in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device technology, information technology, life sciences, medical device technology, mobile communications technology, or renewable energy technology. "Qualified venture fund" means a venture fund required by contract to invest a minimum of 50 percent of its funds in New Jersey-based businesses that the authority, in its sole discretion, based upon the qualified venture fund's investment history, if any, its private placement memorandum and other relevant information, has determined has the capacity to make the minimum investment. "Related person" means: a corporation, partnership, association, or trust controlled by the taxpayer; an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or trust that is in the control of the taxpayer; a corporation, partnership, association, or trust controlled by an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or trust that is in the control of the taxpayer; or a member of the same controlled group as the taxpayer. "Renewable energy technology" means a technology involving the generation of electricity from solar energy; [wind energy;] wave or tidal action; geothermal energy; the combustion of gas from the anaerobic digestion of food waste and sewage sludge at a biomass generating facility; the combustion of methane gas captured from a landfill; and a fuel cell powered by methanol, ethanol, landfill gas, digestor gas, biomass gas, or other renewable fuel but not powered by a fossil fuel. "Venture fund" means a partnership, corporation, trust, or limited liability company that invests cash in a business during the early or expansion stages of a business in exchange for an equity stake in the business in which the investment is made. Venture firm may include a venture capital fund, a family office fund, or a corporate investor fund, provided that a professional manager administers the venture firm. "Verified transfer of funds" means a non-refundable transfer of funds equal to 100 percent of the taxpayer's qualified investment in the New Jersey emerging technology business holding company to a New Jersey emerging technology business by the New Jersey emerging technology business holding company that is accompanied by documentation, as required by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, which provides proof of a cash transaction originating with a taxpayer and concluding with a New Jersey emerging technology business, provided that the transactions from origin to destination occur within the same taxable year. The definitions of "advanced computing," "advanced materials," "biotechnology," "carbon footprint reduction technology," "electronic device technology," "information technology," "life sciences," "medical device technology," "mobile communications technology," "New Jersey emerging technology business," "pilot scale manufacturing," and "renewable energy technology" may be modified by regulation to conform to definitions in other programs administered by the authority. (cf: P.L.2025, c.71, s.3) 10.  The New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations consistent with the purposes of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 11.  Section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) is repealed. 12.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any application submitted to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority for an incentive award or other form of financial assistance on or after the effective date of this act.